Utah statutes.
17-50-309.   Regulation of use of roads.

A county may enact ordinances and make regulations not in conflict with law for the control, construction, alteration, repair, and use of all public roads and highways in the county outside of cities and towns.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 133, 2000 General Session

